Alabama, session 2026rs, HB666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
47 Section 1. Sections 16-22-6 and 36-1.4.4, Code of
48 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
49 "§16-22-6
50 (a) Each Except as provided in subsection (c), each
51 local board of education and certain postsecondary
52 institutions of higher education shall adopt policies or
53 regulations rules which will provide for deductions from
54 salaries of its employees or groups of employees whenever a
55 request is presented to the board or postsecondary institution
56 of higher education by the employees or groups. The deductions
Page 2

of higher education by the employees or groups. The deductions
HB666 INTRODUCED
57 shall be made from salaries earned in at least nine different
58 pay periods and shall be remitted to the appropriate company,
59 association, or organization as specified by the employees
60 within 10 days following each deduction. The deductions may be
61 made for, but not limited to, savings plans, tax sheltered
62 annuities, the Public Employees' Individual Retirement Account
63 Fund, membership dues, voluntary contributions, and group
64 insurance premiums.
65 (b) Deductions for membership dues and voluntary
66 contributions shall be made based upon membership lists and
67 forms provided by the employees' organization. Such lists are
68 toMembership lists shall be corrected, updated, and returned
69 to the employees' designated organization(s)organizations:
70 (1) Annually, not later than November 10 of each school
71 year; and
72 (2) For employment contracts beginning or renewed on or
73 after October 1, 2026, upon notification by an employee
74 organization or professional association that an employee has
75 revoked his or her membership in the organization or
76 association. The 1982-83 membership dues and voluntary
77 contribution authorized, with appropriate yearly adjustments,
78 shall be deducted for each succeeding year unless the employee
79 revokes the deductions in writing on or before September 15 of
80 that year. Voluntary contributions may be revoked by giving a
81 30-day notice in writing. Upon receiving the written notice,
82 the employer shall immediately cancel any upcoming deductions
83 for voluntary contributions.
84 (c)(1) This subsection shall apply to employment
Page 3

(c)(1) This subsection shall apply to employment
HB666 INTRODUCED
85 contracts beginning or renewed on or after October 1, 2026.
86 (2)a. Notwithstanding subsection (a), no local board of
87 education or public institution of higher education may make
88 any deduction or collection from the salary of any employee or
89 group of employees pursuant to this section for a labor
90 organization, including, but not limited to, those for dues or
91 uniform assessments. An employee may pay dues and uniform
92 assessments directly to a labor organization.
93 b. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "labor
94 organization" shall have the same meaning as provided in
95 Section 36-1-4.3.
96 (3) Any employee may revoke his or her membership in an
97 employee organization or professional association at any time.
98 An employee wishing to revoke his or her membership shall
99 submit the revocation to the employee organization or
100 professional association in writing, at which time the
101 employee organization or professional association shall revoke
102 the employee's membership and notify the appropriate employer
103 and the appropriate payroll office of the revocation. Upon an
104 employee's revocation of membership, the employee organization
105 or professional association shall immediately release the
106 employee from any obligations relating to membership dues or
107 voluntary contributions.
108 (4)a. No employee organization or professional
109 association may prohibit or otherwise limit an employee's
110 ability to revoke his or her membership in the organization or
111 association. No employee may be required to provide a reason
112 for revoking his or her membership under this subdivision.
Page 4

for revoking his or her membership under this subdivision.
HB666 INTRODUCED
113 b. This subdivision includes an employee who pays dues
114 or voluntary contributions through salary deductions pursuant
115 to this section, or who pays dues or voluntary contributions
116 directly to an employee organization or professional
117 association.
118 (d) New authorizations for deduction of dues, voluntary
119 contributions, or employee savings plans, must be submitted to
120 the payroll office and deductions shall begin with the pay
121 period next following the receipt of authorization. Upon
122 termination of employment, amounts owed under the
123 authorization of the employee shall be deducted from the
124 employee's final pay due. With the exception of membership
125 dues and voluntary contributions, the board or postsecondary
126 institution of higher education shall not be required to make
127 more than one remittance of amounts deducted during a pay
128 period for a separate type of deduction. Health insurance,
129 life insurance, and tax sheltered annuities shall be
130 interpreted as separate types of deductions. When amounts have
131 been correctly deducted and remitted by the board or
132 postsecondary institution of higher education, the board or
133 postsecondary institution of higher education shall bear no
134 further responsibility or liability for subsequent
135 transactions. No board or postsecondary institution of higher
136 education shall be liable for any error when acting in good
137 faith pursuant to this section.
138 (e)(b) This section shall not apply to any four-year
139 postsecondary institution of higher education."
140 "§36-1-4.4
Page 5

"§36-1-4.4
HB666 INTRODUCED
141 (a) The policies adopted by the state Comptroller for
142 deductions from the salaries of state employees or groups of
143 state employees for employee organizations shall provide that
144 the deductions for membership dues and voluntary contributions
145 shall be made based on membership lists and forms provided by
146 the employees' organization, provided that the policies
147 reflect each of the following:. Such lists
148 (1) Membership lists shall are to be corrected and
149 revised annually:
150 a. Annually, according to procedures to be established
151 by the state Comptroller; and
152 b. For employment contracts beginning or renewed on or
153 after October 1, 2026, upon notification by an employee
154 organization or professional association that an employee has
155 revoked his or her membership in the organization or
156 association.
157 (2) For employment contracts beginning or renewed on or
158 after October 1, 2026, any state employee may revoke his or
159 her membership in an employee organization or professional
160 association at any time. An employee wishing to revoke his or
161 her membership shall submit the revocation to the employee
162 organization or professional association in writing, at which
163 time the employee organization or professional association
164 shall revoke the employee's membership and notify the
165 appropriate employer of the revocation and the appropriate
166 payroll clerk or other appropriate officials, as specified by
167 the Comptroller. Upon an employee's revocation of membership,
168 the employee organization or professional association shall
Page 6

the employee organization or professional association shall
HB666 INTRODUCED
169 immediately release the employee from any obligations relating
170 to membership dues or voluntary contributions.
171 (b) Membership dues and voluntary contributions
172 currently authorized on or before October 1, 2026, shall may
173 continue on an annual basis for the current yearly period and
174 for each succeeding yearly period, except that employees must
175 have the option to revoke their membership or any voluntary
176 contributions at any time pursuant to subsection (a) unless
177 the employee revokes the deduction in writing within 10 days
178 of the next succeeding yearly period. Voluntary contributions
179 may be revoked by giving a 30-day notice in writing.
180 (c)(1) This subsection shall apply to employment
181 contracts beginning or renewed on or after October 1, 2026.
182 (2) No employee organization or professional
183 association may prohibit or otherwise limit an employee's
184 ability to revoke his or her membership in the organization or
185 association. If an employee organization or professional
186 association requires employees to complete a form to revoke
187 membership in the organization or association, the form may
188 not require an employee to provide a reason for the
189 revocation.
190 (3) This subsection includes employees who pay dues or
191 voluntary contributions through salary deductions pursuant to
192 Section 36-1-4.3, or who pay dues or voluntary contributions
193 directly to an employee organization or professional
194 association.
195 (d) New authorizations shall be permitted on a monthly
196 basis according to procedures to be established by the state
Page 7

basis according to procedures to be established by the state
HB666 INTRODUCED
197 Comptroller.
198 (e) Upon leaving state service whether by death,
199 retirement, termination, resignation, leave of absence, or
200 other means, payroll deduction of dues and authorized
201 voluntary deductions shall cease. When an employee returns to
202 state service from an approved leave of absence or other
203 temporary leave, payroll deductions and voluntary
204 contributions shall resume unless the employee revokes the
205 deductions in writing. When amounts have been correctly
206 deducted and remitted by the state Comptroller, the state
207 Comptroller shall bear no further responsibility or liability
208 for subsequent transactions."
209 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
210 1, 2026.
Page 8